Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
76-3104
Environmental covenant, defined.

Environmental covenant
means a servitude that imposes activity and use limitations on real property
and meets the requirements of section 76-2604.

Laws 2011, LB26, § 4.